Contents/Resources/Wolfram Player.app/Contents/SystemFiles/Components/SpellingData/SpellingDictionaries/TechTerms.aff
# Generated by Mathematica 12.0.0 for Mac OS X x86 (64-bit) (May 18, 2019)
SET UTF-8
FLAG num
TRY esianrtolcdugmphbyfvkwzESIANRTOLCDUGMPHBYFVKWZ'
WORDCHARS 0123456789'.-
REP 94
REP nt n't
REP alot a_lot
REP avengence a_vengeance
REP ninties 1990s
REP teached taught
REP rised rose
REP a ei
REP ei a
REP a ey
REP ey a
REP ai ie
REP ie ai
REP are air
REP are ear
REP are eir
REP air are
REP air ere
REP ere air
REP ere ear
REP ere eir
REP ear are
REP ear air
REP ear ere
REP eir are
REP eir ere
REP ch te
REP te ch
REP ch ti
REP ti ch
REP ch tu
REP tu ch
REP ch s
REP s ch
REP ch k
REP k ch
REP f ph
REP ph fv
REP gh f
REP f gh
REP i igh
REP igh i
REP i uy
REP uy i
REP i ee
REP ee i
REP j di
REP di j
REP j gg
REP gg j
REP j ge
REP ge j
REP s ti
REP ti s
REP s ci
REP ci s
REP k cc
REP cc k
REP k qu
REP qu k
REP kw qu
REP o eau
REP eau o
REP o ew
REP ew o
REP oo ew
REP ew oo
REP ew ui
REP ui ew
REP oo ui
REP ui oo
REP ew u
REP u ew
REP oo u
REP u oo
REP u oe
REP oe u
REP u ieu
REP ieu u
REP ue ew
REP ew ue
REP uff ough
REP oo ieu
REP ieu oo
REP ier ear
REP ear ier
REP ear air
REP air ear
REP w qu
REP qu w
REP z ss
REP ss z
REP shun tion
REP shun sion
REP shun cion

SFX 1 N 1
SFX 1 0 ş .

SFX 2 N 1
SFX 2 0 10 .

SFX 3 N 1
SFX 3 0 1FilterModel .

SFX 4 N 1
SFX 4 0 2 .

SFX 5 N 1
SFX 5 0 2D .

SFX 6 N 1
SFX 6 0 2DBox .

SFX 7 N 1
SFX 7 0 2DBoxOptions .

SFX 8 N 1
SFX 8 0 2FilterModel .

SFX 9 N 1
SFX 9 0 3D .

SFX 10 N 1
SFX 10 0 3DBox .

SFX 11 N 1
SFX 11 0 3DBoxOptions .

SFX 12 N 1
SFX 12 0 3Matrix .

SFX 13 N 1
SFX 13 0 a .

SFX 14 N 1
SFX 14 0 Abbreviations .

SFX 15 N 1
SFX 15 0 ability .

SFX 16 N 1
SFX 16 0 able .

SFX 17 N 1
SFX 17 0 ableASCIIQ .

SFX 18 N 1
SFX 18 0 Above .

SFX 19 N 1
SFX 19 0 Abs .

SFX 20 N 1
SFX 20 0 AbsoluteLossLayer .

SFX 21 N 1
SFX 21 0 AbsoluteQ .

SFX 22 N 1
SFX 22 0 Accuracy .

SFX 23 N 1
SFX 23 0 Across .

SFX 24 N 1
SFX 24 0 ACS .

SFX 25 N 1
SFX 25 0 actant .

SFX 26 N 1
SFX 26 0 actibility .

SFX 27 N 1
SFX 27 0 Action .

SFX 28 N 1
SFX 28 0 activate .

SFX 29 N 1
SFX 29 0 active .

SFX 30 N 1
SFX 30 0 Active .

SFX 31 N 1
SFX 31 0 ActiveQ .

SFX 32 N 1
SFX 32 0 Add .

SFX 33 N 1
SFX 33 0 adi .

SFX 34 N 1
SFX 34 0 Adjustments .

SFX 35 N 1
SFX 35 0 ae .

SFX 36 N 1
SFX 36 0 affinity .

SFX 37 N 1
SFX 37 0 age .

SFX 38 N 1
SFX 38 0 age3D .

SFX 39 N 1
SFX 39 0 age3DProjection .

SFX 40 N 1
SFX 40 0 age3DSlices .

SFX 41 N 1
SFX 41 0 ageAccumulate .

SFX 42 N 1
SFX 42 0 ageAdd .

SFX 43 N 1
SFX 43 0 ageAdjust .

SFX 44 N 1
SFX 44 0 ageAlign .

SFX 45 N 1
SFX 45 0 ageApply .

SFX 46 N 1
SFX 46 0 ageApplyIndexed .

SFX 47 N 1
SFX 47 0 ageAspectRatio .

SFX 48 N 1
SFX 48 0 ageAssemble .

SFX 49 N 1
SFX 49 0 ageAugmentationLayer .

SFX 50 N 1
SFX 50 0 ageBoundingBoxes .

SFX 51 N 1
SFX 51 0 ageCache .

SFX 52 N 1
SFX 52 0 ageCacheValid .

SFX 53 N 1
SFX 53 0 ageCapture .

SFX 54 N 1
SFX 54 0 ageCaptureFunction .

SFX 55 N 1
SFX 55 0 ageCases .

SFX 56 N 1
SFX 56 0 ageChannels .

SFX 57 N 1
SFX 57 0 ageClip .

SFX 58 N 1
SFX 58 0 ageCollage .

SFX 59 N 1
SFX 59 0 ageColorSpace .

SFX 60 N 1
SFX 60 0 ageCompose .

SFX 61 N 1
SFX 61 0 ageContainsQ .

SFX 62 N 1
SFX 62 0 ageContents .

SFX 63 N 1
SFX 63 0 ageConvolve .

SFX 64 N 1
SFX 64 0 ageCooccurrence .

SFX 65 N 1
SFX 65 0 ageCorners .

SFX 66 N 1
SFX 66 0 ageCorrelate .

SFX 67 N 1
SFX 67 0 ageCorrespondingPoints .

SFX 68 N 1
SFX 68 0 ageCrop .

SFX 69 N 1
SFX 69 0 ageData .

SFX 70 N 1
SFX 70 0 ageDeconvolve .

SFX 71 N 1
SFX 71 0 ageDemosaic .

SFX 72 N 1
SFX 72 0 ageDifference .

SFX 73 N 1
SFX 73 0 ageDimensions .

SFX 74 N 1
SFX 74 0 ageDisplacements .

SFX 75 N 1
SFX 75 0 ageDistance .

SFX 76 N 1
SFX 76 0 ageEffect .

SFX 77 N 1
SFX 77 0 ageExposureCombine .

SFX 78 N 1
SFX 78 0 ageFeatureTrack .

SFX 79 N 1
SFX 79 0 ageFileApply .

SFX 80 N 1
SFX 80 0 ageFileFilter .

SFX 81 N 1
SFX 81 0 ageFileScan .

SFX 82 N 1
SFX 82 0 ageFilter .

SFX 83 N 1
SFX 83 0 ageFocusCombine .

SFX 84 N 1
SFX 84 0 ageForestingComponents .

SFX 85 N 1
SFX 85 0 ageFormattingWidth .

SFX 86 N 1
SFX 86 0 ageForwardTransformation .

SFX 87 N 1
SFX 87 0 ageGraphics .

SFX 88 N 1
SFX 88 0 ageHistogram .

SFX 89 N 1
SFX 89 0 ageIdentify .

SFX 90 N 1
SFX 90 0 ageInstanceQ .

SFX 91 N 1
SFX 91 0 ageKeypoints .

SFX 92 N 1
SFX 92 0 ageLevels .

SFX 93 N 1
SFX 93 0 ageLines .

SFX 94 N 1
SFX 94 0 ageMargins .

SFX 95 N 1
SFX 95 0 ageMarker .

SFX 96 N 1
SFX 96 0 ageMarkers .

SFX 97 N 1
SFX 97 0 ageMeasurements .

SFX 98 N 1
SFX 98 0 ageMesh .

SFX 99 N 1
SFX 99 0 ageMultiply .

SFX 100 N 1
SFX 100 0 ageOffset .

SFX 101 N 1
SFX 101 0 agePad .

SFX 102 N 1
SFX 102 0 agePadding .

SFX 103 N 1
SFX 103 0 agePartition .

SFX 104 N 1
SFX 104 0 agePeriodogram .

SFX 105 N 1
SFX 105 0 agePerspectiveTransformation .

SFX 106 N 1
SFX 106 0 agePosition .

SFX 107 N 1
SFX 107 0 agePreviewFunction .

SFX 108 N 1
SFX 108 0 agePyramid .

SFX 109 N 1
SFX 109 0 agePyramidApply .

SFX 110 N 1
SFX 110 0 ageQ .

SFX 111 N 1
SFX 111 0 ageRangeCache .

SFX 112 N 1
SFX 112 0 ageRecolor .

SFX 113 N 1
SFX 113 0 ageReflect .

SFX 114 N 1
SFX 114 0 ageRegion .

SFX 115 N 1
SFX 115 0 ageResize .

SFX 116 N 1
SFX 116 0 ageResolution .

SFX 117 N 1
SFX 117 0 ageRestyle .

SFX 118 N 1
SFX 118 0 ageRotate .

SFX 119 N 1
SFX 119 0 ageRotated .

SFX 120 N 1
SFX 120 0 ageSaliencyFilter .

SFX 121 N 1
SFX 121 0 ageScaled .

SFX 122 N 1
SFX 122 0 ageScan .

SFX 123 N 1
SFX 123 0 ageSize .

SFX 124 N 1
SFX 124 0 ageSizeAction .

SFX 125 N 1
SFX 125 0 ageSizeCache .

SFX 126 N 1
SFX 126 0 ageSizeMultipliers .

SFX 127 N 1
SFX 127 0 ageSizeRaw .

SFX 128 N 1
SFX 128 0 ageSubtract .

SFX 129 N 1
SFX 129 0 ageTake .

SFX 130 N 1
SFX 130 0 ageTransformation .

SFX 131 N 1
SFX 131 0 ageTrim .

SFX 132 N 1
SFX 132 0 ageType .

SFX 133 N 1
SFX 133 0 ageValue .

SFX 134 N 1
SFX 134 0 ageValuePositions .

SFX 135 N 1
SFX 135 0 Aggregate .

SFX 136 N 1
SFX 136 0 agingDevice .

SFX 137 N 1
SFX 137 0 ais .

SFX 138 N 1
SFX 138 0 al .

SFX 139 N 1
SFX 139 0 alCI .

SFX 140 N 1
SFX 140 0 alCycles .

SFX 141 N 1
SFX 141 0 alDistribution .

SFX 142 N 1
SFX 142 0 alExpression .

SFX 143 N 1
SFX 143 0 AlgorithmData .

SFX 144 N 1
SFX 144 0 alGraph .

SFX 145 N 1
SFX 145 0 alGrouping .

SFX 146 N 1
SFX 146 0 Aliases .

SFX 147 N 1
SFX 147 0 Alignment .

SFX 148 N 1
SFX 148 0 Alignments .

SFX 149 N 1
SFX 149 0 ality .

SFX 150 N 1
SFX 150 0 alizationLayer .

SFX 151 N 1
SFX 151 0 alize .

SFX 152 N 1
SFX 152 0 alized .

SFX 153 N 1
SFX 153 0 alizedSquaredEuclideanDistance .

SFX 154 N 1
SFX 154 0 alizeVertices .

SFX 155 N 1
SFX 155 0 All .

SFX 156 N 1
SFX 156 0 AllComplete .

SFX 157 N 1
SFX 157 0 AllSteps .

SFX 158 N 1
SFX 158 0 ally .

SFX 159 N 1
SFX 159 0 alMatrixQ .

SFX 160 N 1
SFX 160 0 alNumber .

SFX 161 N 1
SFX 161 0 AlphaChannel .

SFX 162 N 1
SFX 162 0 alPValue .

SFX 163 N 1
SFX 163 0 alsFunction .

SFX 164 N 1
SFX 164 0 Always .

SFX 165 N 1
SFX 165 0 ambre .

SFX 166 N 1
SFX 166 0 amicable .

SFX 167 N 1
SFX 167 0 amond .

SFX 168 N 1
SFX 168 0 amonds .

SFX 169 N 1
SFX 169 0 ampere .

SFX 170 N 1
SFX 170 0 amperes .

SFX 171 N 1
SFX 171 0 ample .

SFX 172 N 1
SFX 172 0 amples .

SFX 173 N 1
SFX 173 0 Amplitude .

SFX 174 N 1
SFX 174 0 an .

SFX 175 N 1
SFX 175 0 anConsecutiveFunction .

SFX 176 N 1
SFX 176 0 anConvert .

SFX 177 N 1
SFX 177 0 anCountingFunction .

SFX 178 N 1
SFX 178 0 and .

SFX 179 N 1
SFX 179 0 andable .

SFX 180 N 1
SFX 180 0 andAll .

SFX 181 N 1
SFX 181 0 andDenominator .

SFX 182 N 1
SFX 182 0 andela .

SFX 183 N 1
SFX 183 0 andelas .

SFX 184 N 1
SFX 184 0 anDeterminant .

SFX 185 N 1
SFX 185 0 andFileName .

SFX 186 N 1
SFX 186 0 andGraph .

SFX 187 N 1
SFX 187 0 AndGraphics .

SFX 188 N 1
SFX 188 0 andNumerator .

SFX 189 N 1
SFX 189 0 anFunction .

SFX 190 N 1
SFX 190 0 ange .

SFX 191 N 1
SFX 191 0 angent .

SFX 192 N 1
SFX 192 0 angeRed .

SFX 193 N 1
SFX 193 0 Angle .

SFX 194 N 1
SFX 194 0 Angles .

SFX 195 N 1
SFX 195 0 anGraph .

SFX 196 N 1
SFX 196 0 anharmonic .

SFX 197 N 1
SFX 197 0 Animation .
