Contents/Resources/Wolfram Player.app/Contents/SystemFiles/Components/SpellingData/SpellingDictionaries/TechTerms.dic
All/33,137,477
Boole/175,176,177,189,195,199,200,201,204,205,206,207,208,210,213
Chebyshev/3,8,657,2157,2295
Column/148,302,687,1012,1399,1506,2034,2076,2098,2099,2162,2371
Condition/142,764,1180
ConicHullRegion/10,352
contr/25,26
Control/30,147
decic/182,183,1719,1720,1758,1759,2317,2318
Del/165,202,280,281,282,283,297,346,883,894,895,896,897,898,899,900,901,902,903,904,905,906,907,908,909,910,911,912,913,914,915,916,918,1204,1284,1285,1286,1287,1288,1289,1381,1999
Display/157,197,829,1004,1012,1053,1773,1989,2046,2132,2186,2255,2256
Dynamic/138,352,363,925,1075,1277,1525,1604,1605,1606,1607,1608,1624,1635,1917,2047,2311,2380,2381,2382
Element/14,578,2264,2373
End/32,631,879,1049
equi/36,196,229,445,516,555,596,637,656,663,664,1496
Euler/194,431,704,855,1063,1204,1206,1207,1208,1558,1807,1900,2145
Exp/178,179,180,181,185,186,188,761,762,763,1064,1333,1334,1365,1366,1723,1724,1725,1726,1727,1728,1729,1730,1731
Factorial/4,1613,1614,1835
Function/144
gon/138,149,1751,1994
Graph/9,270,288,414,486,578,612,632,633,651,657,659,806,815,1173,1174,1187,1223,1224,1225,1226,1227,1228,1229,1230,1231,1232,1233,1234,1235,1236,1237,1238,1239,1240,1241,1242,1243,1244,1245,1246,1247,1248,1250,1251,1252,1339,1399,1455,1509
Hold/155,156,487
homeomorphic/158
homotopic/138
I/24
In/28,29,394
Input/146,271,291,972,973,974,1012,1019,1124,1631,1679,1773,2048,2130,2132,2134,2247,2257,2266
Inset/10,11,352,363
Jacobi/173,174,184,198,206,392,467,557,584,671,689,1640,1641,1681,1770
Join/23,764,768,769,770,1012
korun/13,2390
kuru/1,1994
Log/2,4,310
Mean/20,243,446,447,465,605,617,634,636,992,1097,1539,1593,1645,1842,2055,2056,2114,2199
multi/166,307,428,444,458,473,476
myrio/169,170,174,206,384,385,495,496,544,545,573,574,963,964,965,966,1091,1092,1167,1168,1169,1170,1171,1401,1402,1417,1418,1518,1520,1531,1532,1533,1586,1587,1654,1656,1714,1715,1793,1794,1879,1880,1883,1884,1994,2017,2018,2067,2124,2125,2197,2198,2347,2348,2349,2350,2355,2356,2358,2359,2363,2364
Norm/138,139,141,145,150,151,152,153,154,159,162,163,1053
Or/190,192
PacletSite/32,1927,1994,2310
petas/171,172,758,759,1265,1269,1270
PieChart/9
Plot/9,12,667,1002,1090,1150,1400,1433,1438,1455,1475,1476,1548,1822,1826,1890,1891,1892,1893,1919,2137,2147,2213,2337
Point/10,11,352,363,752,760,985,1012,1475
Polygon/10,11,160,193,352,363,530,598,1181,1340,2004,2091
Print/17,27,1002,1012,1020,1157,1306,1310,1311,1314,1315,1519,1761,1762,1839,2186
Raster/9,10,11,244,352,363,1053
Real/19,342,343,525,638,938,1385
Replace/155,1165,1281,1510,1789,1809,1929
Resampling/143,1588
Reve/140,1981,1982,1983,1984,1985,1986,1987,1988
Right/193,250,251,252,254,269,492,537,679,680,681,1069,2181,2182,2183,2280,2281,2282,2312,2313,2314,2315,2335,2336
Row/148,302,352,1163,1399
Save/16,287,502,603
ScheduledTask/31,1302,1303,1690,1994
Select/15,16,490,766,789,997,1350,1351,1352,1353,1354,1355,1356,1357,1358,1359,1360,1361,1363,1364,2375
Sequence/147,277,388,546,1005,1006,1012,1180,1450,1500,1618,1830,1840,1845,1930,1943,1948,2106
Set/22,161,240,278,303,359,463,528,530,607,645,845,924,977,987,988
Show/197,285,293,294,396,402,411,461,469,512,522,561,1095,1136,1137,1349,1435,1475,1779,1844,1859,2022,2057,2101,2133,2153,2232
Sinh/13
Slider/5,6,7,352,363
Solve/164,607
Sound/187,224,653,655
Span/34,435,436,1044,1045,1046,1266,1508,1567,1594,1664,1665,2151
tetri/167,168
Text/10,11,147,308,349,352,388,395,459,512,578,805,1012,1115
Thom/35,266,268,1866,2031
TimeSeries/135,1010,1323,1348,1544,1545,1601,1602,1934,1935,2055,2220,2372
Trace/18,27,305,614,629,1023,1336,1484,1699,1718,1746,1798,1832,1838,1854,2007
trit/191,1721,1957,1994
URL/21,374,533,535,595,652,677,678,820,932,935,968,969,1788,1876,1877,1906,1942,1994,2000,2001,2058,2059,2140
weka/169,170,174,206,338,339,377,380,384,385,495,496,544,545,573,574,963,964,965,966,1091,1092,1167,1168,1169,1170,1401,1402,1417,1418,1518,1520,1531,1532,1533,1586,1587,1654,1656,1714,1715,1793,1794,1879,1880,1994,2017,2018,2067,2197,2198,2347,2348,2349,2350,2355,2356,2358,2359,2363,2364
